vi: Hiệu ứng tích hợp trên bộ lấy mẫu rãnh: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Nén; Delay; EQ; Bộ lọc; Flanger; Granular; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturation/Distortion; Sidechain; Khác
ko: 그루브 샘플러 내장 이펙트: 비트크러시/데시메이터; 코러스; 압축; 딜레이; EQ; 필터; 플랜저; 그래뉼라; 리미터; 루퍼/리샘플러; 오버드라이브; 페이저; 리버브; 새츄레이션/디스토션; 사이드체인; 기타
zh-TW: Groove 採樣器內建效果: 位元粉碎/降取樣; 和聲; 壓縮; 延遲; 等化器; 濾波器; 鑲邊; 粒子化; 限制器; 循環器/重新取樣器; 破音; 移相器; 殘響; 飽和/失真; 側鏈; 其他
zh-CN: 凹槽采样器内置效果: 降比特/降采样; 合唱; 压缩; 延迟; EQ; 滤波器; 镶边; 粒子; 限制器; 循环器/重采样器; 过载; 移相; 混响; 饱和/失真; 侧链; 其他
nb: Groove sampler tilstedeværende effekter: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Komprimering; Delay; EQ; Filter; Flanger; Granulær; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Metning/distorsjon; Sidechain; Annet
sk-SK: Vstavané efekty groove samplera: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Kompresia; Delay; EQ; Filter; Flanger; Granulárny; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturácia/skreslenie; Sidechain; Iné
pt-BR: Sampler de groove efeitos integrados: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Compressão; Delay; Equalizador; Filtro; Flanger; Granular; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturação/Distorção; Sidechain; Outro
pl: Efekty pokładowe groove samplera: Bitcrush / Decimator; Chorus; Kompresja; Delay; EQ; Filtr; Flanger; Granularny; Limiter; Looper / Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Pogłos; Saturacja / Przesterowanie; Sidechain; Inne
it: campionatore Groove con effetti integrati: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Compressione; Delay; EQ; Filtro; Flanger; Granulare; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Riverbero; Saturazione/Distorsione; Sidechain; Altro
ro-RO: Efecte integrate în samplerul de groove: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Comprimare; Delay; Egalizator (EQ); Filtru; Flanger; Granular; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturație/Distorsiune; Sidechain; Altele
th: เอฟเฟ็กต์ในตัวของ Groove sampler: Bitcrush/Decimator; คอรัส; การบีบอัด; ดีเลย์; EQ; ฟิลเตอร์; แฟลงเกอร์; แกรนูลาร์; ลิมิตเตอร์; ลูปเปอร์/รีแซมเพลอร์; โอเวอร์ไดรฟ์; เฟสเซอร์; รีเวิร์บ; แซทูเรชัน/ดิสทอร์ชัน; ไซด์เชน; อื่นๆ
sv: Inbyggda effekter för groove-sampler: Bitcrush/decimator; Chorus; Komprimering; Delay; EQ; Filter; Flanger; Granulär; Limiter; Looper/resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturation/distortion; Sidechain; Övrigt
de: Integrierte Effekte des Groove-Samplers: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Komprimierung; Delay; EQ; Filter; Flanger; Granular; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Sättigung/Verzerrung; Sidechain; Sonstige
cs: Groove sampler vestavěné efekty: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Komprese; Delay; EQ; Filtr; Flanger; Granular; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturace/Distortion; Sidechain; Ostatní
es: Efectos de incorporación del secuenciador de ritmos: Bitcrush/Diezmador; Chorus; Compresión; Delay; Ecualizador; Filtro; Flanger; Granular; Limitador; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturación/distorsión; Sidechain; Otro
lt-LT: Groove sampler integruoti efektai: „Bitcrush“ / „Decimator“; „Chorus“; Kompresija; Uždelsimas („Delay“); Ekvalaizeris (EQ); Filtras; „Flanger“; Granulinis; Ribotuvas („Limiter“); „Looper“ / „Resampler“; „Overdrive“; Fazeris („Phaser“); Reverberacija („Reverb“); Sotis / iškraipymas („Saturation“ / „Distortion“); „Sidechain“; Kita
fr: Effets intégrés de l’échantillonneur de groove: Bitcrusher/décimateur; Chorus; Compression; Délai; Égaliseur; Filtre; Flanger; Granulaire; Limiteur; Looper/rééchantillonneur; Overdrive; Phaser; Réverbération; Saturation/distorsion; Sidechain; Autre
tr: Davul makinesi dahili efektleri: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Sıkıştırma; Delay; EQ; Filtre; Flanger; Granüler; Sınırlandırıcı; Looper/Yeniden Örnekleyici; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturasyon/Distorsiyon; Sidechain; Diğer
nl: Groove-sampler ingebouwde effecten: Bitcrusher/decimator; Chorus; Compressie; Delay; EQ; Filter; Flanger; Granulair; Limiter; Looper/resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Verzadiging/vervorming; Sidechain; Overig
pt-PT: Efeitos de inclusão do sampler Groove: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Compressão; Delay; EQ; Filtro; Flanger; Granular; Limitador; Looper/resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturação/distorção; Sidechain; Outros
el: Ενσωματωμένα εφέ του groove sampler: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Συμπίεση; Delay; EQ; Φίλτρο; Flanger; Granular; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturation/Distortion; Sidechain; Άλλο
hr-HR: Groove sampler uvođenje u organizaciju efekata: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Kompresija; Delay; EQ; Filtar; Flanger; Granularni; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturacija/distorzija; Sidechain; Ostalo
en: Groove sampler onboard effects: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Compression; Delay; EQ; Filter; Flanger; Granular; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Saturation/Distortion; Sidechain; Other
ru: Встроенные эффекты грув-сэмплера: Биткрашер/дециматор; Хорус; Компрессия; Дилей; Эквалайзер; Фильтр; Фленджер; Гранулярный эффект; Лимитер; Лупер/ресемплер; Овердрайв; Фейзер; Реверберация; Сатурация/дисторшн; Сайдчейн; Другое
da: Indbyggede effekter i groove-sampler: Bitcrush/decimator; Chorus; Komprimering; Delay; EQ; Filter; Flanger; Granulær; Limiter; Looper/resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Mætning/forvrængning; Sidechain; Andet
sl-SI: Vgrajeni učinki ritmičnega vzorčevalnika: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Kompresija; Delay; Izenačevalnik (EQ); Filter; Flanger; Granularno; Omejevalnik (Limiter); Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Nasičenost/Distortion; Sidechain; Drugo
fi: Grooveboksin sisäiset efektit: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Kompressio; Viive; EQ; Suodatin; Flanger; Granular; Limitteri; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Kaiku; Saturaatio/särö; Sidechain; Muu
hu: Beépített groove sampler effektek: Bitcrush/Decimator; Chorus; Kompresszió; Delay; EQ; Szűrő; Flanger; Granuláris; Limiter; Looper/Resampler; Overdrive; Phaser; Reverb; Szaturáció/Torzítás; Sidechain; Egyéb
bg-BG: Вградени ефекти на груув семплера: Биткръшър/дециматор; Хорус; Компресиране; Дилей; Еквалайзер (EQ); Филтър; Фленжър; Грануларен; Лимитер; Лупър/ресемплер; Овърдрайв; Фейзър; Реверберация; Сатурация/дисторшън; Сайдчейн; Други
ja: グルーブサンプラーオンボーディングエフェクト: ビットクラッシュ/デシメーター; コーラス; コンプレッション; ディレイ; EQ; フィルター; フランジャー; グラニュラー; リミッター; ルーパー/リサンプラー; オーバードライブ; フェイザー; リバーブ; サチュレーション/ディストーション; サイドチェイン; その他